North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-20 Soil Conservation
4.1-20-32.
Failure to perform land use regulations — Hearing on — Supervisors to perform — Costs and expenses.

If the supervisors of any district find any land use regulations prescribed in any ordinance are not being observed on particular lands, tending to increase erosion on those lands and interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district, the supervisors may present to the district court a duly verified petition setting forth:

The adoption of the ordinance prescribing land use regulations;

The alleged failure of the defendant land occupier to observe the regulations and perform particular work, operations, or avoidances required by the regulations and that the failure tends to increase erosion on those lands and interfere with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district; and

Requesting that the court order the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances within a reasonable time and that if the defendant fails to do so, the supervisors may:

Enter upon the land;

Perform the necessary work to bring the condition of the land into conformity with the regulations; and

Assess the costs and expenses of the work, with interest, to the defendant.

Upon presentation of a petition under subsection 1, the court shall cause process to be issued against the defendant, and shall hear the case.

If it appears to the court testimony is necessary for the proper disposition of the matter, the court may take evidence or appoint a referee to take evidence as it may direct and report the evidence to the court with the referee’s findings of fact and conclusions of law.

If a referee is appointed, the report of the referee constitutes a part of the proceedings upon which the determination of the court must be made.

The court may dismiss the petition or it may order the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances. The court may provide upon the failure of the defendant to initiate performance as ordered by the court within the time specified in the order of the court and to prosecute the same to completion with reasonable diligence, the supervisors may enter upon the lands involved and perform the necessary work to bring the condition of the land into conformity with the regulations and assess the costs and expenses of the work, with interest at the rate of five percent per annum, to the defendant.

If the person in possession of lands subject to a petition under subsection 1 is other than the owner, the owner of those lands must be joined as a party defendant. In all cases, notice must be given to all other interested parties in person, or by publication in the manner provided in this chapter for publication of due notice.

In any case under this section, the court shall retain jurisdiction until any work ordered by the court has been completed.

Upon completion of any work ordered by the court under subsection 2, the supervisors may file a petition with the court and serve a copy upon the defendants, stating the costs and expenses sustained by the supervisors in the performance of the work and asking for judgment in that amount, with interest. The court may enter judgment for the amount of costs and expenses approved by the court plus interest at the rate of five percent per annum until paid. The supervisors may certify to the county auditor of the county in which the district is located the amount of the judgment, which is a lien upon the lands and must be collected as taxes or assessments are collected. As the judgment is paid or collected, the proceeds must be paid over to the district that certified the judgment to the auditor.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-33.
Board of adjustment — Members — Appointment — Vacancies — Compensation.

When the supervisors of any district adopt an ordinance prescribing land use regulations, the supervisors shall provide by ordinance for the establishment of a board of adjustment to consist of three members, each to be appointed for a term of three years, except the members first appointed who are appointed for terms of one, two, and three years respectively. The members of each board of adjustment must be appointed by the committee with the advice and approval of the supervisors of the district for which the board has been established, and are removable, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason. A hearing on the removal of a member of a board of adjustment must be conducted jointly by the committee and the supervisors. A vacancy on a board of adjustment must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment except the appointment is for the unexpired vacant term. Members of the committee and the supervisors of the district may not serve as members of the board of adjustment. The members of the board shall receive five dollars a day for the time spent on the work of the board in addition to their expenses, including traveling expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties. The supervisors shall pay the necessary administrative and other expenses of operation incurred by the board upon the certificate of the chairman of the board.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-34.
Board of adjustment — Rules — Chairman — Meetings — Quorum — Records.

The board of adjustment shall adopt rules to govern its procedure, in accordance with this chapter and any ordinance adopted under this chapter. The board shall designate, and may replace at any time, a chairman from among its members. Meetings of the board must be held at the call of the chairman and at any other time as the board may determine. Any two members of the board constitute a quorum. The chairman, or another member of the board designated by the chairman to serve as acting chairman, may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses. All meetings of the board are open to the public. The board shall keep a full and accurate record of its proceedings, all documents filed with it, and all orders entered by the board. The record must be filed in the office of the board and is a public record.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-35.
Petition to board of adjustment to vary land use regulations — Service — Hearing — Board’s powers.

Any qualified elector residing in the district may file a petition with the board of adjustment seeking a variance from strictly complying with the land use regulations. Copies of a petition must be served upon the chairman of the supervisors of the district where the lands are located and upon the chairman of the committee. The board shall fix a time for the hearing of the petition and cause due notice of the hearing to be given. The petitioner may appear in person, by agent, or by attorney at the hearing and the supervisors and the committee may appear and be heard. If the board determines on the facts presented at the hearing that there are great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships in the way of applying the strict letter of any of the land use regulations upon the lands of the petitioner, the board shall make and record the determination and findings of fact as to the specific conditions that establish the great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships. Upon the findings and determination, the board may enter an order authorizing a variance from the terms of the land use regulations in its application to the lands of the petitioner consistent with the spirit of the land use regulations, and with substantial justice and the public health, safety, and welfare.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-36.
Taking of testimony at hearing.

At the request of the board of supervisors, the testimony at a hearing conducted under section 4.1-20-35 must be taken by a court reporter, by a stenographer, or by use of an electronic recording device. The board of supervisors is responsible for the cost of taking testimony.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-37.
Aggrieved petitioner and supervisors may appeal to district court from order of board — Procedure.

Any petitioner or the supervisors of any district may appeal an order of a board of adjustment to the district court as provided in section 28-34-01.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-38.
Cooperation among district supervisors.

The supervisors of any two or more districts organized under this chapter may cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-39.
State agencies to cooperate with district supervisors.

Agencies of this state having jurisdiction over any state-owned lands, and agencies of any county or other political subdivision of this state having jurisdiction over any county-owned or other publicly owned lands lying within the boundaries of any district shall cooperate to the fullest extent with the supervisors of the district in the effectuation of programs and operations undertaken by the supervisors under this chapter. The supervisors have free access to enter and perform work upon such publicly owned lands. The provisions of land use regulations adopted under this chapter have the force and effect of law over all such publicly owned lands and must be in all respects observed by the agencies administering such lands.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-40.
Discontinuance of districts — Petition — Referendum — Eligible qualified electors.

Five years after the date a district was organized, twenty-five percent of the qualified electors living within the boundaries of the district may file a petition with the state soil conservation committee to terminate the operations of the district. The committee then shall conduct public hearings upon the petition to determine whether there is sufficient basis for an election to be held. If the committee determines there is sufficient basis for an election, the committee shall give due notice of the holding of an election and shall issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of the election within sixty days after the committee has made its determination. The question to be voted on at the election must be submitted by ballot in substantially the following form:

Should the (insert name of district) be terminated? Yes • No •

Click to view

All qualified electors residing within the boundaries of the district are eligible to vote in the election. The committee shall supervise the election. Informalities in the conduct of the election or in any matters relating to the election do not invalidate the election or its result if notice of the election has been given substantially as required by this chapter and the election has been fairly conducted.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-41.
Duties of committee after election on discontinuance of the district has been held.

The committee shall publish the result of any election on the question of discontinuance of a district immediately after the vote has been had. If a majority of the votes cast in the election favored the discontinuance of the district, the committee shall make its certificate that it has determined that the continued operation of the district is not administratively feasible. If a majority of the votes cast in the referendum favored the continuance of the district, the committee shall consider and determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively feasible. If the committee determines the continued operation of the district is administratively feasible, the committee shall record that determination and deny the petition for discontinuance, and if the committee determines the continued operation thereof is not administratively feasible, the committee shall record the determination and certify its determination to the supervisors of the district. In making its determination, the committee shall give due weight and regard to the number and attitudes of the qualified electors residing within the district, the number voting in the referendum, the proportion that the votes cast in favor of the discontinuance of the district are of the total number of votes cast, the probable expense of carrying on erosion control operations within the district, and any other economic and social factors as may be relevant to the determination having regard to the legislative policy as set forth in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-42.
Termination of affairs of district — Disposal of property — Certificate of dissolution.

Upon receipt from the committee of its certification that the committee has determined the continued operation of the district is not administratively feasible, the supervisors shall proceed to terminate the affairs of the district. The supervisors of the district may dispose of all or part of any property belonging to the district at public auction and shall use the proceeds of the sale to pay any liabilities. The balance of any funds and undisposed property becomes the property of the county or counties the district is a part of as directed by the supervisors. The supervisors thereupon shall file an application, duly verified, with the secretary of state for the discontinuance of the district, and shall transmit with such application the certificate of the committee setting forth its determination that the continued operation of the district is not administratively feasible. The application must recite what property, if any, of the district has been disposed of, the liabilities paid, and the property or proceeds paid over as provided herein and must set forth a full accounting of such properties and their sale proceeds. The secretary of state shall issue to the supervisors a certificate of dissolution and record the certificate in an appropriate record in the secretary of state’s office.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-43.
Ordinances, regulations, and contracts of districts after dissolution.

After a certificate of dissolution has been issued as provided in section 4.1-20-42, all ordinances and regulations that have been adopted and in force within the dissolved district are of no further force and effect. All contracts that have been made, to which the district supervisors are parties, remain in force and effect for the period provided in the contracts, and the committee is substituted for the district or supervisors as party to the contracts. The committee is entitled to all the benefits and subject to all the liabilities under the contracts and has the same right as the supervisors of the district would have had.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-44.
Petitions for discontinuance of district — Limitation on filing.

The state soil conservation committee may not entertain petitions for the discontinuance of any district, conduct elections upon those petitions, or make determinations pursuant to the petitions in accordance with the provisions of this chapter more than once in any five-year period.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-45.
Consolidation of districts — Petition — Election — Conduct of election.

Two or more districts may be consolidated into one district by compliance with this chapter. A petition for consolidation of soil conservation districts must be filed with the state soil conservation committee and must be signed by at least twenty-five qualified electors living in each district. Upon the filing of a petition, the committee by resolution shall fix a date for an election to be held in each district and shall direct the supervisors to cause notice of the election to be posted in at least five conspicuous places within the district and to be published once each week for two consecutive weeks before the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the districts involved. Only qualified electors living within the district are eligible to vote at the election. The notice must state the date of the election, identify each polling place for holding the election, the time when the polls will open and close, and the question to be submitted to the qualified electors. The notice must be substantially in the following form:

On , , an election will be held at for the purpose of submitting (Designate polling place or places) to the qualified electors within soil conservation (Name of district) district the question as to whether soil conservation (Names of districts) districts embracing the following townships (Designate townships, by number and range) shall be consolidated into one soil conservation district. The ballot must be in the following form: Shall soil conservation districts embracing the (Names of districts) following townships (Designate townships, by number and range) be consolidated into one soil conservation district? Yes No

Click to view

The board of supervisors of the district shall appoint the board of election for each polling place. The board of election must consist of one inspector, one judge, and one clerk. Members of the election board are entitled to receive five dollars for their services.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-46.
Conduct of election — Canvass of votes.

An election upon the question of consolidating two or more soil conservation districts must be conducted in accordance with the laws of the state prescribing the conduct of general elections. After the polls are closed, the board of election shall canvass the votes and the clerk of the board shall certify to the board of supervisors of the clerk’s district and to the committee the result of the election.

The committee shall publish the result of the election. If a majority of the ballots cast on the question in each district are for consolidation, the committee shall file with the secretary of state a statement certifying that the consolidated district has been duly and regularly established.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-47.
Supervisors of consolidated district — Terms of office — Powers and duties.

The members of the board of supervisors of a newly consolidated district are the supervisors from each of the districts that have been consolidated whose existing terms of office would last expire if the new consolidated district were not established. Those members shall determine by lot the order in which their terms of office in the consolidated district will expire. If more than three districts are consolidated, the members of the board of supervisors of the consolidated district must be determined by lot among the supervisors from the districts whose existing terms would expire last. If only two districts are consolidated, the third member of the board of supervisors of the consolidated district must be determined by lot among the remaining supervisors from both such districts. The supervisors thus selected shall hold office until the next general election of the district and until their successors are elected and qualified. Supervisors of a consolidated district have all the powers and duties of supervisors of a soil conservation district as enumerated in this chapter. The name of a consolidated district must be determined by the new supervisors of the consolidated district.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-48.
Costs and expenses of consolidation — Disposition of property — Contracts of districts after consolidation.

All costs and expenses incidental to the consolidation of two or more districts must be borne equally by each of the consolidated districts. All property and money of the districts that have been consolidated become the property of the newly established district. All contracts to which the supervisors of each of the districts consolidated are parties remain in force and effect for the period provided in the contracts and the supervisors of the consolidated district are substituted as parties in the contracts. Supervisors of a consolidated district are entitled to all the benefits and subject to all the liabilities under the contracts and have the same rights as the supervisors of the district that entered the contract would have had if a consolidated district had not been established.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-20-49.
Soil conservation trust lands.

The state of North Dakota holds in trust for use by the soil conservation districts of the state for the soil conservation program the property in Burleigh County described as follows:

Township one hundred thirty-eight north, range eighty west, fifth principal meridian: west one-half of section fifteen and that portion of the southeast quarter of section sixteen described as follows: beginning at the southeast corner of said section sixteen, thence running north on the east line of said section six hundred sixty feet [201.17 meters]; thence west parallel with the south line of said section two thousand three hundred ten feet [704.09 meters]; thence south six hundred sixty feet [201.17 meters] to a point on the south line of said section two thousand three hundred ten feet [704.09 meters] west of the southeast corner of said section; thence east along the south line of said section two thousand three hundred ten feet [704.09 meters] to the place of beginning; containing thirty-five acres [14.16 hectares], more or less.

Subject, however, to the following rights, easements, exceptions, and reservations:

Easements for existing or established roads, highways, and public utilities, if any.

Right reserved by the Department of the Army “to enter thereon and remove gravel and use the established rubbish disposal area as long as any part of Fort Lincoln Military Reservation is used by the Department of the Army”.

Reservation to the United States of America and its assigns of an undivided three-fourths interest in all coal, oil, gas, and other minerals, including three-fourths of all sand, gravel, stone, clay and similar materials, in or under the property, together with the usual mining rights, powers, and privileges, including the right at any and all times, to enter upon the land and use those parts of the surface as may be necessary in prospecting for, mining, saving and removing the minerals or materials, provided the quantities of sand, gravel, stone, clay and similar materials, as may be required, may be utilized in the operation or improvement of the lands.

The lands, having been conveyed to the state of North Dakota by the United States of America for use in carrying out the soil conservation program of the soil conservation districts of the state, are further subject to the condition the land must be used for public purposes and if at any time cease to be so used must revert to and become revested in the United States. Upon approval by the United States of America in accordance with the original grant of the trust lands, the trust lands may be leased, sold, conveyed, traded for, or replaced by other land suitable for the benefit of the soil conservation program in this state. No lease, sale, conveyance, trade, or replacement of the trust lands may be made under conditions that will cause or may cause the reversion of the lands back to the United States of America.

The control, custody, possession, supervision, management, operation, and transfer of the trust lands and any replacement lands is hereby vested in the North Dakota association of soil conservation districts for use in carrying out the soil conservation program of the soil conservation districts of the state and the association in such control, custody, possession, supervision, management, operation, and transfer shall hold all accumulations of personal property or surplus funds derived from said lands in trust for the soil conservation districts of the state for use in carrying out the soil conservation program. Any transfer, sale, trade, or replacement of trust lands is excepted from section 38-09-01, and the North Dakota association of soil conservation districts may transfer all or a portion of the minerals held by the state or the association which are located under the trust lands. Any funds generated through bonuses, leases, royalties, or otherwise generated by minerals reserved by the association or funds generated from the sale of minerals must be held in trust as provided in this section.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.